District of Columbia statutes.
8-1810

Education and incentive program.

The Mayor shall implement an education and incentive program, which shall include the following:

(1)

Low cost spay and neuter clinic services; and

(2)

Program for education of animal owners.

Oct. 18, 1979, D.C. Law 3-30, § 11, 26 DCR 765
1981 Ed., § 6-1010.
1973 Ed., § 6-2410.
Delegation of authority pursuant to law 3-30, see Mayor’s Order 83-206, August 2, 1983.